Nebraska, session 109, LB923.
Be it enacted by the people of the State of Nebraska,
-1-

LB923 LB923
2026 2026
Section 1. Section 23-346.01, Reissue Revised Statutes of Nebraska,
is amended to read:
23-346.01 In It shall be the duty of the county clerk, in all
counties having a population of one hundred fifty thousand or more
inhabitants as determined by the most recent federal decennial census, on
or before December 1, annually, to prepare separate estimates of the
supplies, materials, equipment and machinery required for the use of the
county officers during the coming year, which by law are not required to
be furnished by the state, and, in order to properly estimate the amounts
of supplies, materials, equipment and machinery to be needed by the
county government, the county clerk or the county clerk's designee shall
keep a perpetual inventory of all personal property of the county.
Sec. 2. Section 23-1303, Reissue Revised Statutes of Nebraska, is
amended to read:
23-1303 (1) The county clerk shall not issue any county warrants
except upon claims approved by the county board. Every warrant issued
shall be numbered consecutively as allowed from July 1 to June 30,
corresponding with the fiscal year of the county. The county clerk shall
maintain records including the date, amount, and number of each warrant,
the name of the person to whom a warrant is issued, and the date a
warrant is returned as canceled. The records shall be made accessible to
the public for viewing, in either an electronic or printed format.
(2)(a) The county clerk shall develop and implement a system of
warrant preparation and issuance by electronic or mechanical means which
is compatible with the funds transfer system established by the county
treasurer pursuant to subsection (6) of this section. The county clerk
may combine warrants for individual funds into a summary warrant that
lists each fund and the amount requested from such fund.
(b) Warrant includes an order issued by the chairperson of the
county board and countersigned by the county clerk directing that the
county treasurer make payment in a specified amount to a specified payee
-2-

LB923 LB923
2026 2026
by the use of a dual signature negotiable instrument as provided for in
subsections (3) and (4) of this section, an electronic funds transfer
system, a telephonic funds transfer system, funds transfers as provided
in article 4A, Uniform Commercial Code, a mechanical funds transfer
system, or any other funds transfer system established by the county
treasurer.
(3) The chairperson of the county board shall sign each warrant or
shall cause each warrant to be signed in his or her behalf either
personally, by delegation of authority, or by facsimile or electronic
signature. The signature of the chairperson of the county board shall
signify that the payment intended by a warrant bearing such signature is
proper under the appropriate laws of the state and resolutions of the
county.
(4) The county clerk shall countersign all warrants issued by the
chairperson of the county board either personally, by delegation of
authority, or by facsimile or electronic signature.
(5) The county treasurer shall, if requested by the county clerk or
the county board, establish procedures and processes for facsimile or
electronic signature of warrants.
(6) The county treasurer may establish and operate an electronic
funds transfer system, a telephonic funds transfer system, funds
transfers as provided for in article 4A, Uniform Commercial Code, a
mechanical funds transfer system, or any other funds transfer system for
the payment of funds from and the deposit of receipts into the county
treasury. Such system as established by the county treasurer shall employ
internal control safeguards and after meeting such safeguards shall be
deemed to satisfy any signature requirements. The use of an electronic
funds transfer system, a telephonic funds transfer system, funds
transfers as provided for in article 4A, Uniform Commercial Code, a
mechanical funds transfer system, or any other funds transfer system
established by the county treasurer shall not create any rights that
-3-

LB923 LB923
2026 2026
would not have been created had an order, drawn by the chairperson of the
county board upon the county treasurer directing the latter to pay a
specified amount to a specified payee by the use of a dual signature
negotiable instrument as provided for in subsections (3) and (4) of this
section, been used as the payment medium.
Sec. 3. Section 23-1309, Reissue Revised Statutes of Nebraska, is
amended to read:
23-1309 (1) It shall be the duty of the county clerk in each county
to keep in a separate book or books, entitled Discharge Record, a copy of
all discharges or records of separation from active duty from the armed
forces of the United States. Information contained in the Discharge
Record shall be confidential and made available only to the veteran,
county veterans service officer, or post service officer of a recognized
veterans organization.
(2) The county clerk may transfer the Discharge Record to the State
Archives of the Nebraska State Historical Society for permanent
preservation after the veteran's federal Official Military Personnel File
becomes a public archival record or after sixty-two years, whichever is
later.
Sec. 4. Original sections 23-346.01, 23-1303, and 23-1309, Reissue
Revised Statutes of Nebraska, are repealed.
Sec. 5. The following section is outright repealed: Section
23-1313, Reissue Revised Statutes of Nebraska.
-4-